Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-171
Definitions; where found.

For purposes of the Livestock Brand Act, the definitions found in sections 54-171.01 to 54-190 shall be used.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB435, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB768, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 2.
July 18, 2026